incubator/apertium-lt-en.lt.dix
    <!-- Second declension -->
    <pardef n="abažūr/as__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ui</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ų</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ams</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ais</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uose</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>asna</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="autokel/ias__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ias</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>io</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iui</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ią</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yje</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iai</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ių</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iams</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ius</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iais</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iuose</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>isna</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iai</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="abejoto/jas__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jas</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jo</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jui</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ją</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ju</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jyje</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>juje</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>jy</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>jin</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jau</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jai</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jų</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jams</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jus</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jais</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>juose</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>jisna</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jai</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="albumas"><i>album</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apaštalas"><i>apaštal</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asfaltas"><i>asfalt</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="audimas"><i>audim</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="banknotas"><i>banknot</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biurokratas"><i>biurokrat</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="būstas"><i>būst</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daugumas"><i>daugum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diferencialas"><i>diferencial</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dumblas"><i>dumbl</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elektrikas"><i>elektrik</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="faraonas"><i>faraon</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fotografas"><i>fotograf</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="geologas"><i>geolog</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grybas"><i>gryb</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="imtuvas"><i>imtuv</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iždininkas"><i>iždinink</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kanauninkas"><i>kanaunink</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="katilas"><i>katil</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klimatas"><i>klimat</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kraštotyrininkas"><i>kraštotyrinink</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leitenantas"><i>leitenant</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mastas"><i>mast</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="momentas"><i>moment</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="olandas"><i>oland</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="patas"><i>pat</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pistoletas"><i>pistolet</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pretendentas"><i>pretendent</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="raistas"><i>raist</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="salonas"><i>salon</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skundas"><i>skund</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="strykas"><i>stryk</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="technologas"><i>technolog</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="turtas"><i>turt</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vasalas"><i>vasal</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="įrašas"><i>įraš</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ūkas"><i>ūk</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žinovas"><i>žinov</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elnias"><i>eln</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kelias"><i>kel</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svečias"><i>sveč</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="velnias"><i>veln</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atradėjas"><i>atradė</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="augintojas"><i>auginto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="auklėtojas"><i>auklėto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bandytojas"><i>bandyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dėstytojas"><i>dėstyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gamintojas"><i>gaminto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="globėjas"><i>globė</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gydytojas"><i>gydyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gyventojas"><i>gyvento</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="investuotojas"><i>investuoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="keliautojas"><i>keliauto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kovotojas"><i>kovoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laimėtojas"><i>laimėto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="liudytojas"><i>liudyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mokytojas"><i>mokyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mąstytojas"><i>mąstyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="naikintojas"><i>naikinto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nešiotojas"><i>nešioto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pardavėjas"><i>pardavė</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pasekėjas"><i>pasekė</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pavaduotojas"><i>pavaduoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="platintojas"><i>platinto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prižiūrėtojas"><i>prižiūrėto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="projektuotojas"><i>projektuoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puoselėtojas"><i>puoselėto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="raikytojas"><i>raikyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="siuvėjas"><i>siuvė</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="statytojas"><i>statyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sudarytojas"><i>sudaryto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tapytojas"><i>tapyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tarnautojas"><i>tarnauto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="teisėjas"><i>teisė</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tvarkytojas"><i>tvarkyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="užkariautojas"><i>užkariauto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="valgytojas"><i>valgyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vykdytojas"><i>vykdyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šalavijas"><i>šalavi</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
